Hawaii statutes.
PART X.
SEXUALLY TRANSMITTED DISEASES

Note

Part heading amended by L 1991, c 32, pt of §1.

§321-111 Sexually transmitted disease
prevention program. (a) The departments of health and education shall
cooperate with each other and other public and private authorities as they may
deem advisable for the education of minors and members of the general public on
sexually transmitted diseases and the prevention of sexually transmitted
diseases. For the purpose of this section, "minor" means any person
fourteen years of age or older and under the age of majority.

(b) The department of health shall formulate,
supervise, and coordinate throughout the State an educational program for the
purposes of preventing sexually transmitted diseases, instructing the general
public in detecting the diseases, and encouraging early treatment.

(c) The information shall be made available
upon request to all minors and members of the general public without parental
consent and the information shall be distributed to all public school
counselors requesting educational materials concerning sexually transmitted
disease prevention, detection, and treatment. [L 1969, c 149, §1; am L 1991, c
32, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next